District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1210.31

Emerging Business District Demonstration Projects.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7182, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7024(f), 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of subchapter, see §§ 7192 and 7193 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of subchapter, see §§ 7182 and 7183 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of subchapter, see §§ 7182 and 7183 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 7182 and 7183, see § 7016(z)(5) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).